Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB831.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 311.720 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.710 to 311.820, and laws of the Commonwealth unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) (a) "Abortion" means the performance of any act with the intent to terminate the[
clinically diagnosable] pregnancy of a woman[ known to be pregnant with
knowledge that the termination by those means will, with reasonable
likelihood, cause the death of the unborn child by one (1) or more of the
following means:
1. Administering, prescribing, or providing any abortion-inducing drug as
defined in KRS 311.7731, potion, medicine, or any other substance or
device to a pregnant female; or
2. Using an instrument or external force on a pregnant female].
(b) "Abortion" does not mean those actions that require termination of a
pregnancy[separating the pregnant woman from her unborn child] when
performed by a licensed physician as provided in KRS 311.723;
(2) "Accepted medical procedures" means procedures of the type performed in the
manner and in a facility with equipment sufficient to meet the standards of medical
care which physicians engaged in the same or similar lines of work, would
ordinarily exercise and devote to the benefit of their patients;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky;
(4) "Consent," as used in KRS 311.710 to 311.820 with reference to those who must
give their consent, means an informed consent expressed by a written agreement to
submit to an abortion on a written form of consent to be promulgated by the
secretary for health and family services;
Page 1 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(5) "Ectopic pregnancy" means an unborn child or embryo developing outside of the
uterus;
(6) "Family planning services" means educational, medical, and social services and
activities that enable individuals to determine the number and spacing of their
children and to select the means by which this may be achieved;
(7)[(6)] "Fetus" means a human being from fertilization until birth;
(8)[(7)] "Hospital" means those institutions licensed in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 216;
(9)[(8)] "Human being" means any member of the species homo sapiens from
fertilization until death;
(10) "Incomplete miscarriage" or "missed miscarriage" means the loss of a
pregnancy in which the pregnancy tissue or products of conception have not yet
been expelled from the uterus;
(11) "Lethal fetal anomaly" means a fetal condition diagnosed before birth, in
writing, by a physician within his or her reasonable medical judgment that the
unborn child is incompatible with life outside the womb, and confirmed by the
opinion of another physician, in writing, following an examination of the patient
and a review of the relevant medical records;
(12)[(9)] "Medical emergency" or "medically necessary" means any condition which,
on the basis of the physician's reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the
medical condition of a pregnant woman[female] as to necessitate the immediate
performance or inducement of an abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or
for which a delay will directly, indirectly, or potentially create a serious risk of
substantial and irreversible:
(a) Harm to the physical health of the pregnant woman, or life-threatening
conditions, including but not limited to premature rupture of the
membranes, hemorrhage, preeclampsia, or cardiac complications;
Page 2 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(b) Long-term damage to reproductive health or fertility, including
complications that may render the pregnant woman unable to conceive or
carry a pregnancy in the future; or
(c) Impairment of a major bodily function;
(13)[(10)] "Medical necessity" means the same as "medically necessary"[a medical
condition of a pregnant woman that, in the reasonable medical judgment of the
physician who is attending the woman, so complicates the pregnancy that it
necessitates the immediate performance or inducement of an abortion];
(14)[(11)] "Partial-birth abortion" means an abortion in which the physician performing
the abortion partially vaginally delivers a living fetus before killing the fetus and
completing the delivery;
(15)[(12)] "Perinatal care" means the health care provided to both the mother and child,
including prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum care, with a focus on optimizing
outcomes and addressing potential complications;
(16)[(13)] "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine in the
Commonwealth or osteopathy pursuant to this chapter;
(17)[(14)] "Probable gestational age of the embryo or fetus" means the gestational age
that, in the judgment of a physician, is, with reasonable probability, the gestational
age of the embryo or fetus at the time that the abortion is planned to be performed;
(18)[(15)] "Public agency" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky; any agency,
department, entity, or instrumentality thereof; any city, county, agency, department,
entity, or instrumentality thereof; or any other political subdivision of the
Commonwealth, agency, department, entity, or instrumentality thereof;
(19)[(16)] "Reasonable medical judgment" means the range of conclusions or
recommendations that licensed medical practitioners with similarly sufficient
training and experience may communicate to a patient based upon current available
medical evidence;
Page 3 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(20)[(17)] "Unborn child" has the same meaning as in Section 10 of this Act["unborn
human being" in KRS 311.772];
(21)[(18)] "Vaginally delivers a living fetus before killing the fetus" means deliberately
and intentionally delivers into the vagina a living fetus, or a substantial portion
thereof, for the purpose of performing a procedure the physician knows will kill the
fetus, and kills the fetus; and
(22)[(19)] "Viability" means that stage of human development when the life of the
unborn child may be continued by natural or life-supportive systems outside the
womb of the mother.
Section 2. KRS 311.723 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion[action that requires separating a pregnant woman from her unborn
child] shall be performed, except the following when performed by a physician
based upon his or her reasonable medical judgment:
(a) A medical procedure performed with the intent to save the life or preserve the
health of an unborn child;
(b) Lifesaving miscarriage management, which includes medically necessary
interventions when the pregnancy has ended or is in the unavoidable and
untreatable process of ending due to spontaneous, missed, or incomplete
miscarriage;
(c) Sepsis and hemorrhage emergency medical interventions required when a
miscarriage or impending miscarriage results in a life-threatening infection or
excessive bleeding;
(d) A medically necessary intervention, inducement, or delivery for the removal
of a dead child from the uterine cavity[, when documented in the woman's
medical record along with the results of an obstetric ultrasound test,
confirming that fetal cardiac activity is not present at a gestational age when it
should be present];
Page 4 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(e) The removal of an ectopic pregnancy or a pregnancy that is not implanted
normally within the endometrial cavity;
(f) The use of methotrexate or similar medications to treat an ectopic pregnancy;
(g) The removal of a molar pregnancy;
(h) The removal of an unborn child with a lethal fetal anomaly;
(i) A medical procedure necessary based on reasonable medical judgment to
prevent the death or substantial risk of death of the pregnant woman due to a
physical condition, or to prevent serious, permanent impairment of a life-
sustaining organ of a pregnant woman. However, the physician shall make
reasonable medical efforts under the circumstances to preserve both the life of
the mother and the life of the unborn child in a manner consistent with
reasonable medical practice;[ or]
(j)[(i)] Medical treatment provided to the mother by a licensed physician,
which results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death of the unborn
human being; or
(k) If, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment, the pregnancy is the
result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS
530.020(2)(b) or (c), and the gestational age of the unborn child is twenty-
two (22) weeks or less.
(2) No treatment or procedure authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall be
performed except in compliance with regulations which the cabinet shall
promulgate to ensure that:
(a) 1. Before the treatment or procedure is performed, the pregnant woman
shall have a private medical consultation either with the physician who
is to provide the treatment or perform the procedure or with the referring
physician in a place, at a time and of a duration reasonably sufficient to
enable the physician to determine whether, based upon his or her
Page 5 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
reasonable medical judgment, the action is necessary;
2. The physician shall document in the pregnant woman's medical record
the pregnant woman's informed consent to the treatment or procedure
following a discussion, acknowledged in writing by the woman, of the
risks, benefits, and alternatives to the treatment or procedure, sufficient
in scope for a reasonable person to make an informed decision;
(b) The physician who is to provide the treatment or perform the procedure or the
referring physician shall[will] describe the basis for his or her reasonable
medical judgment that the action is necessary on a form prescribed by the
cabinet as required by KRS 213.101; and
(c) 1. Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply when, in the reasonable
medical judgment of the attending physician based on the particular
facts of the case before him or her, there exists a medical emergency. In
the case of a medical emergency, the physician shall describe the basis
of his or her reasonable medical judgment that an emergency exists on a
form prescribed by the cabinet as required by KRS 213.101; and
2. If an emergency exists which limits the time available for
documentation or the scope of the informed consent discussion, the
physician[ shall endeavor to complete the requirements of this
subsection to the extent possible without undue risk to the woman's life
or health and] shall promptly complete any required documentation
when the emergency no longer exists.
(3) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, nothing in this chapter shall be
construed as prohibiting a physician from prescribing or a woman from using birth
control methods or devices, including, but not limited to, intrauterine devices, oral
contraceptives, or any other birth control method or device.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as permitting any violation of KRS
Page 6 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
311.772.
Section 3. KRS 311.725 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed or induced except with the voluntary and informed
written consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed or
induced. Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is
voluntary and informed if and only if:
(a) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, a physician, licensed
nurse, physician assistant, or social worker to whom the responsibility has
been delegated by the physician has verbally informed the woman of all of the
following:
1. The nature and purpose of the particular abortion procedure or treatment
to be performed and of those medical risks and alternatives to the
procedure or treatment that a reasonable patient would consider material
to the decision of whether or not to undergo the abortion;
2. The probable gestational age of the embryo or fetus at the time the
abortion is to be performed;
3. The medical risks associated with the pregnant woman carrying her
pregnancy to term; and
4. The potential ability of a physician to reverse the effects of prescription
drugs intended to induce abortion, where additional information about
this possibility may be obtained, and contact information for assistance
in locating a physician who may aid in the reversal;
(b) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, in an individual, private
setting, a physician, licensed nurse, physician assistant, or social worker to
whom the responsibility has been delegated by the physician has informed the
pregnant woman that:
1. The cabinet publishes the printed materials described in subsection
Page 7 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section and that she has a right to review the
printed materials and that copies will be provided to her by the
physician, licensed nurse, physician assistant, or social worker free of
charge if she chooses to review the printed materials;
2. Medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care,
childbirth, and neonatal care, and that more detailed information on the
availability of the[such] assistance is contained in the printed materials
published by the cabinet;
3. The father of the fetus is liable to assist in the support of her child, even
in instances where he has offered to pay for the abortion; and
4. It is illegal in Kentucky to intentionally perform an abortion, in whole or
in part, because of:
a. The sex of the unborn child;
b. The race, color, or national origin of the unborn child; or
c. The diagnosis, or potential diagnosis, of Down syndrome or any
other disability, except a lethal fetal anomaly;
(c) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, a copy of the printed
materials has been provided to the pregnant woman if she chooses to view
these materials;
(d) The pregnant woman certifies in writing, prior to the performance or
inducement of the abortion:
1. That she has received the information required to be provided under
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; and
2. That she consents to the particular abortion voluntarily and knowingly,
and she is not under the influence of any drug of abuse or alcohol; and
(e) Prior to the performance or inducement of the abortion, the physician who is
scheduled to perform or induce the abortion or the physician's agent receives a
Page 8 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
copy of the pregnant woman's signed statement, on a form which may be
provided by the physician, on which she consents to the abortion and that
includes the certification required by paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(2) [By January 1, 1999, ]The cabinet shall cause to be published in English in a
typeface not less than twelve (12) point type the following[ materials]:
(a) Materials that inform the pregnant woman about public and private agencies
and services that are available to assist her through her pregnancy, upon
childbirth, and while her child is dependent, including, but not limited to,
adoption agencies. The materials shall include a comprehensive list of the
available agencies and a description of the services offered by the agencies
and the telephone numbers and addresses of the agencies, and inform the
pregnant woman about available medical assistance benefits for prenatal care,
childbirth, and neonatal care and about the support obligations of the father of
a child who is born alive. The cabinet shall ensure that the materials are
comprehensive and do not directly or indirectly promote, exclude, or
discourage the use of any agency or service described in this section;
(b) Materials that inform the pregnant woman of the probable anatomical and
physiological characteristics of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or fetus at two
(2) week gestational increments for the first sixteen (16) weeks of her
pregnancy and at four (4) week gestational increments from the seventeenth
week of her pregnancy to full term, including any relevant information
regarding the time at which the fetus possibly would be viable. The materials
shall use language that is understandable by the average person who is not
medically trained, shall be objective and nonjudgmental, and shall include
only accurate scientific information about the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or
fetus at the various gestational increments. The materials shall include, for
each of the two (2) or[of] four (4) week increments specified in this
Page 9 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
paragraph, a pictorial or photographic depiction of the zygote, blastocyte,
embryo, or fetus. The materials shall also include, in a conspicuous manner, a
scale or other explanation that is understandable by the average person and
that can be used to determine the actual size of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo,
or fetus at a particular gestational increment as contrasted with the depicted
size of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or fetus at that gestational increment;
and
(c) Materials that inform the pregnant woman of the potential ability of a
physician to reverse the effects of prescription drugs intended to induce
abortion, where additional information about this possibility may be obtained,
and contact information for assistance in locating a physician who may aid in
the reversal.
(3) Upon submission of a request to the cabinet by any person, hospital, physician, or
medical facility for one (1) or more copies of the materials published in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section, the cabinet shall make the requested number of
copies of the materials available to the person, hospital, physician, or medical
facility that requested the copies.
(4) If a medical emergency or medical necessity compels the performance or
inducement of an abortion, the physician who will perform or induce the abortion,
prior to its performance or inducement if possible, shall inform the pregnant woman
of the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that an immediate
abortion is necessary. Any physician who performs or induces an abortion without
the prior satisfaction of the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section
because of a medical emergency or medical necessity shall enter the reasons for the
conclusion that a medical emergency or medical necessity exists in the medical
record of the pregnant woman.
(5) If the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section are satisfied, consent to
Page 10 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
an abortion shall be presumed to be valid and effective.
(6) The failure of a physician to satisfy the conditions of subsection (1) of this section
prior to performing or inducing an abortion upon a pregnant woman may be the
basis of disciplinary action pursuant to KRS 311.595.
(7) The cabinet shall charge a fee for each copy of the materials distributed in
accordance with subsections (1) and (3) of this section. The fee shall be sufficient to
cover the cost of the administration of the materials published in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section, including the cost of preparation and distribution of
materials.
Section 4. KRS 311.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Auscultate[Ascultate]" means to examine by listening for sounds made by
internal organs of the fetus, specifically for a fetal heartbeat, utilizing an
ultrasound transducer or a fetal heart rate monitor;
(b) "Obstetric ultrasound" or "ultrasound" means the use of ultrasonic waves for
diagnostic or therapeutic purposes, specifically to monitor a developing fetus;
and
(c) "Qualified technician" means a medical imaging technologist as defined in
KRS 311B.020 who is certified in obstetrics and gynecology by the American
Registry for Diagnostic Medical Sonography or a nurse midwife or advance
practice nurse practitioner in obstetrics with certification in obstetrical
ultrasonography.
(2) Prior to a woman giving informed consent to having any part of an abortion
performed, the physician who is to perform the abortion or a qualified technician to
whom the responsibility has been delegated by the physician shall:
(a) Perform an obstetric ultrasound on the pregnant woman;
(b) Provide a simultaneous explanation of what the ultrasound is depicting, which
Page 11 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
shall include the presence and location of the unborn child within the uterus
and the number of unborn children depicted and also, if the ultrasound image
indicates that fetal demise has occurred, inform the woman of that fact;
(c) Display the ultrasound images so that the pregnant woman may view the
images;
(d) Auscultate[Ascultate] the fetal heartbeat of the unborn child so that the
pregnant woman may hear the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible;
(e) Provide a medical description of the ultrasound images, which shall include
the dimensions of the embryo or fetus and the presence of external members
and internal organs, if present and viewable; and
(f) Retain in the woman's medical record a signed certification from the pregnant
woman that she has been presented with the information required to be
provided under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection and has viewed the
ultrasound images, listened to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible, or
declined to do so. The signed certification shall be on a form prescribed by the
cabinet.
(3) When the ultrasound images and heartbeat sounds are provided to and reviewed
with the pregnant woman, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
pregnant woman from averting her eyes from the ultrasound images or requesting
the volume of the heartbeat be reduced or turned off if the heartbeat is audible.
Neither the physician, the qualified technician, nor the pregnant woman shall be
subject to any penalty if the pregnant woman refuses to look at the displayed
ultrasound images or to listen to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible.
(4) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to any requirement contained
in KRS 311.725 or any other section of KRS 311.710 to 311.820.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply:
(a) In the case of a medical emergency or medical necessity. If a medical
Page 12 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
emergency or medical necessity compels the performance or inducement of an
abortion, the physician who will perform or induce the abortion, prior to its
performance or inducement if possible, shall inform the pregnant woman of
the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that an immediate
abortion is necessary. Any physician who performs or induces an abortion
without the prior satisfaction of the requirements of this section because of a
medical emergency or medical necessity shall enter the reasons for the
conclusion that a medical emergency or medical necessity exists in the
medical record of the pregnant woman; or
(b) If the unborn child the pregnant woman is carrying has a lethal fetal
anomaly.
Section 5. KRS 311.732 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:
(a) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen (18);
(b) "Emancipated minor" means any minor who is or has been married or has by
court order or otherwise been freed from the care, custody, and control of her
parents; and
(c) "Abortion" means the use of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other
substance or device with intent to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known
to be pregnant[ with intent] other than as provided in Section 2 of this Act[to
increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the
child after live birth, or to remove a dead fetus].
(2) No person shall perform an abortion upon a minor unless:
(a) The attending physician has secured the informed written consent of the
minor and one (1) parent or legal guardian with joint or physical custody and
the consenting parent or legal guardian of the minor has made a reasonable
attempt to notify any other parent with joint or physical custody at least forty-
Page 13 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
eight (48) hours prior to providing the informed written consent.
1. Notice shall not be required to be provided to any parent who has:
a. Previously been enjoined by a domestic violence order or
interpersonal protective order, regardless of whether or not the
person to be protected by the order was the minor; or
b. Been convicted of, or entered into a diversion program for;[,]
ii. A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as
defined in KRS 17.500; or[ for]
iii. A violent or sexual criminal offense under KRS Chapter 506,
507, 507A, 508, 509, 510, 529, 530, or 531.
2. The informed written consent shall include:
a. A copy of the minor's government-issued identification, a copy of
the consenting parent's or legal guardian's government-issued
identification, and written documentation including but not limited
to a birth certificate, court-ordered custodial paperwork, or tax
return, establishing that he or she is the lawful parent or legal
guardian; and
b. The parent's or legal guardian's certification that he or she consents
to the abortion. The certification shall be in a signed, dated, and
notarized document that has been initialed on each page and that
contains the following statement, which shall precede the signature
of the parent or legal guardian: "I, (insert name of parent or legal
guardian), am the (select "parent" or "legal guardian") of (insert
name of minor) and give consent for (insert name of attending
physician) to perform an abortion on her. Under penalties of
perjury, I declare that I have read the foregoing statement and that
the facts stated in it are true."
Page 14 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
3. The attending physician shall keep a copy of the informed written
consent in the medical file of the minor for five (5) years after the minor
reaches eighteen (18) years of age or for seven (7) years, whichever is
longer.
4. The attending physician securing the informed written consent from a
parent or legal guardian under this subsection shall execute for inclusion
in the medical record of the minor an affidavit stating: "I, (insert name
of attending physician), certify that, according to my best information
and belief, a reasonable person under similar circumstances would rely
on the information presented by both the minor and her parent or legal
guardian as sufficient evidence of identity.";
(b) The minor is emancipated and the attending physician has received the
informed written consent of the minor; or
(c) The minor elects to petition any Circuit or District Court of the
Commonwealth pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and obtain an order
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section granting consent to the abortion and
the attending physician has received the informed written consent of the
minor.
(3) Every minor shall have the right to petition any Circuit or District Court of the
Commonwealth for an order granting the right to self-consent to an abortion
pursuant to the following procedures:
(a) The minor or her next friend may prepare and file a petition setting forth the
request of the minor for an order of consent to an abortion;
(b) The court shall ensure that the:
1. Minor prepares or her next friend is given assistance in preparing and
filing the petition; and
2. [shall ensure that the ]Minor's identity is kept anonymous;
Page 15 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(c) The minor may participate in proceedings in the court on her own behalf or
through her next friend and the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for her.
The court shall advise her that she has a right to court-appointed counsel and
shall provide her with such counsel upon her request;
(d) All proceedings under this section shall be anonymous and shall be given
preference over other matters to ensure that the court may reach a decision
promptly, but in no case shall the court fail to rule within seventy-two (72)
hours of the time of application, provided that the seventy-two (72) hour
limitation may be extended at the request of the minor; and
(e) The court shall hold a hearing on the merits of the petition before reaching a
decision. The court shall hear evidence at the hearing relating to:
1. The minor's:
a. Age;
b. Emotional development and stability;
c. Maturity;
d. Intellect;
e. Credibility and demeanor as a witness;
f. Ability to accept responsibility;
g. Ability to assess both the current and future life-impacting
consequences of, and alternatives to, the abortion; and
h. Ability to understand and explain the medical risks of the abortion
and to apply that understanding to her decision; and
2. Whether there may be any undue influence by another on the minor's
decision to have an abortion.
(4) (a) If the court finds by:
1. Clear and convincing evidence that the minor is sufficiently mature to
decide whether to have an abortion;
Page 16 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
2. Clear and convincing evidence that the requirements of this section are
not in the best interest of the minor; or
3. A preponderance of the evidence that the minor is the victim of child
abuse or sexual abuse inflicted by one (1) or both of her parents or her
legal guardian;
the court shall enter a written order, making specific factual findings and legal
conclusions supporting its decision to grant the petition for an abortion.
(b) If the court does not make any of the findings specified in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the court shall deny the petition.
(c) As used in this subsection, "best interest of the minor" shall not include
financial best interest, financial considerations, or the potential financial
impact on the minor or the minor's family if the minor does not have an
abortion.
(5) Any minor shall have the right of anonymous and expedited appeal to the Court of
Appeals, and that court shall give precedence over other pending matters.
(6) All hearings under this section, including appeals, shall remain confidential and
closed to the public. The hearings shall be held in chambers or in a similarly private
and informal setting within the courthouse.
(7) No fees shall be required of any minor who declares she has insufficient[no
sufficient] funds to pursue the procedures provided by this section.
(8) (a) The Supreme Court is respectfully requested to promulgate any rules[ and
regulations] it deems[feels are] necessary to ensure that proceedings under
this section are handled in an expeditious and anonymous manner.
(b) The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall
report by February 1 of each year to the Legislative Research Commission
and the cabinet[ on] the number of petitions filed under subsection (3) of this
section for the preceding year, and the timing and manner of disposal of the
Page 17 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
petition by each court. For each approved petition granting an abortion filed
under subsection (3) of this section, the specific court finding in subsection
(4) of this section shall be included in the report.
(9) (a) The requirements of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section shall not apply
when, in the best medical judgment of the physician based on the facts of the
case before him or her, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the
pregnancy as to require an immediate abortion.
(b) If a medical emergency exists, the physician shall make reasonable attempts,
whenever possible, and without endangering the minor, to contact the parent
or legal guardian of the minor, and may proceed, but must document reasons
for the medical necessity in the minor's medical records.
(c) The physician shall inform the parent or legal guardian, in person or by
telephone, within twenty-four (24) hours of the abortion, including details of
the medical emergency that necessitated the abortion without the parent's or
legal guardian's consent. The physician shall also provide this information in
writing to the parent or legal guardian at his or her last known address by
first-class mail or by certified mail, return receipt requested, with delivery
restricted to the parent or legal guardian.
(10) A report indicating the basis for any medical judgment that warrants failure to
obtain consent pursuant to this section shall be filed with the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services on a form supplied by the cabinet. This report shall be confidential.
(11) Failure to obtain consent as required by[pursuant to the requirements of] this
section shall be[is] prima facie evidence of failure to obtain informed consent and
of interference with family relations in appropriate civil actions. The law of this
state shall not be construed to preclude the award of exemplary damages in any
appropriate civil action relevant to violations of this section. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to limit the common-law rights of parents.
Page 18 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(12) A minor upon whom an abortion is performed is not guilty of violating this section.
Section 6. KRS 311.7701 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.7701 to 311.7711:
(1) "Conception" means fertilization;
(2) "Contraceptive" means a drug, device, or chemical that prevents conception;
(3) "Ectopic pregnancy" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(4) "Fertilization" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(5)[(4)] "Fetal heartbeat" means cardiac activity or the steady and repetitive rhythmic
contraction of the fetal heart within the gestational sac;
(6)[(5)] "Fetus" means the human offspring developing during pregnancy from the
moment of conception and includes the embryonic stage of development;
(7)[(6)] "Frivolous conduct" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.784;
(8)[(7)] "Gestational age" means the age of an unborn human individual as calculated
from the first day of the last menstrual period of a pregnant woman;
(9)[(8)] "Gestational sac" means the structure that comprises the extraembryonic
membranes that envelop the fetus and that is typically visible by ultrasound after
the fourth week of pregnancy;
(10)[(9)] "Intrauterine pregnancy" means a pregnancy in which the fetus is attached to
the placenta within the uterus of the pregnant woman;
(11)[(10)] "Lethal fetal anomaly" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(12) "Medical emergency" or "medically necessary" has the same meaning as in
Section 1 of this Act[KRS 311.781];
(13)[(11)] "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(14)[(12)] "Pregnancy" means the human female reproductive condition that begins with
fertilization, when the woman is carrying the developing human offspring, and that
is calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the woman;
(15)[(13)] "Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
Page 19 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
function" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(16)[(14)] "Spontaneous miscarriage" means the natural or accidental termination of a
pregnancy and the expulsion of the fetus, typically caused by genetic defects in the
fetus or physical abnormalities in the pregnant woman;
(17)[(15)] "Standard medical practice" means the degree of skill, care, and diligence that
a physician of the same medical specialty would employ in like circumstances. As
applied to the method used to determine the presence of a fetal heartbeat for
purposes of KRS 311.7704, "standard medical practice" includes employing the
appropriate means of detection depending on the estimated gestational age of the
fetus and the condition of the woman and her pregnancy; and
(18)[(16)] "Unborn child" and "unborn human individual" have the same meaning as
"unborn child" has in KRS 311.781.
Section 7. KRS 311.7706 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall[ intentionally]
perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of
causing or abetting the termination of the life of the unborn human individual the
pregnant woman is carrying and whose fetal heartbeat has been detected in
accordance with KRS 311.7704(1).
(2) (a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a physician who performs a
medical procedure that, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment:[,]
1. Is designed or intended to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to
prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function as defined in Section 10 of this Act of the
pregnant woman;
2. Is necessary because of a lethal fetal anomaly, ectopic pregnancy or
other extrauterine pregnancy, missed miscarriage, or incomplete
miscarriage; or
Page 20 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
3. Is performed because, in the reasonable medical judgment of the
physician, the pregnancy is the result of rape under KRS 510.040,
510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020(2)(b) or (c), and the
gestational age of the unborn child is twenty-two (22) weeks or less.
(b) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in paragraph (a)
1. of this subsection shall, in writing:
1. Declare that the medical procedure is necessary, to the best of the
physician's reasonable medical judgment, to prevent the death of the
pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant
woman; and
2. Specify the pregnant woman's medical condition that the medical
procedure is asserted to address and the medical rationale for the
physician's conclusion that the medical procedure is necessary to
prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of
the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of
the pregnant woman.
(c) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in paragraph
(a)3. of this subsection shall, in writing, specify the basis for the
determination that the gestational age of the unborn child is twenty-two (22)
weeks or less.
(d) The physician shall place the written document required by paragraph (b) or
(c) of this subsection in the pregnant woman's medical records. The physician
shall maintain a copy of the document in the physician's own records for at
least seven (7) years from the date the document is created.
(3) A person is not in violation of subsection (1) of this section if the person acts in
accordance with KRS 311.7704(1) and the method used to determine the presence
Page 21 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
of a fetal heartbeat does not reveal a fetal heartbeat.
(4) A pregnant woman on whom an abortion is intentionally performed or induced in
violation of subsection (1) of this section is not guilty of violating subsection (1) of
this section or of attempting to commit, conspiring to commit, or complicity in
committing a violation of subsection (1) of this section. In addition, the pregnant
woman is not subject to a civil penalty based on the abortion being performed or
induced in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section shall not repeal or limit any other provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes that restricts or regulates the performance or inducement
of an abortion by a particular method or during a particular stage of a pregnancy.
Section 8. KRS 311.772 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Fertilization" means that point in time when a male human sperm penetrates
the zona pellucida of a female human ovum;
(b) "Medical emergency" or "medically necessary" has the same meaning as
in Section 1 of this Act;
(c) "Pregnant" means the human female reproductive condition of having a living
unborn human being within her body throughout the entire embryonic and
fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and
childbirth; and
(d)[(c)] "Unborn human being" means an individual living member of the
species homo sapiens throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the
unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and childbirth.
(2) The provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon, and to the
extent permitted, by the occurrence of any of the following circumstances:
(a) Any decision of the United States Supreme Court which reverses, in whole or
in part, Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), thereby restoring to the
Page 22 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit abortion; or
(b) Adoption of an amendment to the United States Constitution which, in whole
or in part, restores to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit
abortion.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, and 9 of this Act and
subsections (4) and (6) of this section[(a) Except as provided in KRS 311.723],
no person may knowingly:
(a)[1.] Administer to, prescribe for, procure for, or sell to any pregnant woman
any medicine, drug, or other substance with the specific intent of causing or
abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being; or
(b)[2.] Use or employ any instrument or procedure upon a pregnant woman
with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of an
unborn human being.[
(b) Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be guilty of a
Class D felony.]
(4) The following shall not be a violation of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) For a licensed physician to perform a medical procedure that is medically
necessary in the reasonable medical judgment of the physician to prevent the
death or substantial risk of death due to a physical condition, or to prevent the
serious, permanent impairment of a life-sustaining organ of a pregnant
woman. However, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
physician shall make reasonable medical efforts under the circumstances to
preserve both the life of the mother and the life of the unborn human being in
a manner consistent with reasonable medical practice;[ or]
(b) For a licensed physician to perform an abortion because of a lethal fetal
anomaly;
(c) For a licensed physician to perform an abortion if in the reasonable
Page 23 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
medical judgment of the physician the pregnancy is the result of rape under
KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060 or incest under KRS 530.020(2(b) or (c),
and the gestational age of the unborn child is twenty-two (22) weeks or less;
or
(d) Medical treatment provided to the mother by a licensed physician which
results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn human
being.
(5) (a) Except as provided in this subsection, and notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, a physician who complies with the requirements of KRS
311.710 to 311.830 shall be immune:
1. From criminal liability and penalty for any harm or damage alleged to
arise from an act or omission in the treatment of a woman related to
the termination of a pregnancy or a lost pregnancy, except nothing in
this paragraph limits any liability for gross negligence or wanton,
willful, malicious, or intentional conduct; and
2. From civil liability for any personal injury or damages alleged to arise
from the treatment of a pregnant woman, except nothing in this
paragraph limits any civil liability for injury or damage arising from a
deviation of the accepted medical standard of care, gross negligence,
or willful, malicious, or intentional conduct.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to amend, repeal, or alter any
other immunity, defense, limitation of liability, or procedure available or
required under any other law or contract.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to subject the pregnant mother upon
whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and
penalty.
(7)[(6)] Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the sale, use,
Page 24 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
prescription, or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical, if it is
administered prior to the time when a pregnancy could be determined through
conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive measure is sold, used,
prescribed, or administered in accordance with manufacturer instructions.
(8)[(7)] The provisions of this section shall be effective relative to the appropriation of
Medicaid funds, to the extent consistent with any executive order by the President
of the United States, federal statute, appropriation rider, or federal regulation that
sets forth the limited circumstances in which states must fund abortion to remain
eligible to receive federal Medicaid funds pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396 et seq.
Section 9. KRS 311.780 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed or prescribed knowingly after the unborn child may
reasonably be expected to have reached viability, except when:
(a) Medically necessary to preserve the life or health of the woman; or
(b) There is a lethal fetal anomaly as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) In those instances where an abortion is performed under this section, the person
performing the abortion shall take all reasonable steps in keeping with reasonable
medical practices to preserve the life and health of the child, including but not
limited to KRS 311.760(2), except when the abortion is performed under
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
Section 10. KRS 311.781 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.781 to 311.786:
(1) "Fertilization" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum;
(2) "Gestational age" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.7701;
(3) "Medical emergency" or "medically necessary" has the same meaning as in
Section 1 of this Act[means a condition that in the physician's reasonable medical
judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at that time, so complicates
the woman's pregnancy as to necessitate the immediate performance or inducement
Page 25 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
of an abortion in order to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to avoid a
serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function of the pregnant woman that delay in the performance or inducement of the
abortion would create];
(4) "Lethal fetal anomaly" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(5) "Pain-capable unborn child" means an unborn child of a probable gestational age of
fifteen (15) weeks or more;
(6)[(5)] "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(7)[(6)] "Probable gestational age" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(8)[(7)] "Reasonable medical judgment" means a medical judgment that would be
made by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the
treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved;
(9)[(8)] "Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function" means any medically diagnosed condition that in the reasonable medical
judgment of the physician so complicates the pregnancy of the woman as to
directly,[ or] indirectly, or potentially cause:[ the substantial and irreversible]
(a) Harm to the physical health of the pregnant woman, or life-threatening
conditions, including but not limited to unborn premature rupture of the
membranes, hemorrhage, preeclampsia, inevitable abortion, or cardiac
complications;
(b) Long-term damage to reproductive health or fertility, including
complications that may render the pregnant woman unable to conceive or
carry a pregnancy in the future; or
(c) Impairment of a major bodily function[. A medically diagnosed condition that
constitutes a "serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function" includes pre-eclampsia, inevitable abortion, and
premature rupture of the membranes, but does not include a condition related
Page 26 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
to the woman's mental health]; and
(10)[(9)] "Unborn child" means an individual organism of the species homo sapiens
from fertilization until live birth.
Section 11. KRS 311.782 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, and 9 of this Act and subsection (2)
of this section, no person shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally
attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman when the probable
gestational age of the unborn child is fifteen (15) weeks or greater.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under subsection (1) of this section
that the abortion was intentionally performed or induced or intentionally attempted
to be performed or induced by a physician and that the physician determined, in the
physician's reasonable medical judgment, based on the facts known to the physician
at that time, that either of the following applied:
(a) The probable gestational age of the unborn child was less than fifteen (15)
weeks; or
(b) The abortion was performed in compliance with Section 2 of this
Act[necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to avoid a
serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be necessary if it is based
on a claim or diagnosis that the pregnant woman will engage in conduct that
would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function or if it is based on any reason related to her mental
health].
(3) (a) Except when a medical emergency exists that prevents compliance with KRS
311.783, the affirmative defense set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section
shall[does] not apply unless the physician who intentionally performs or
induces or intentionally attempts to perform or induce the abortion makes a
Page 27 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
determination of the probable gestational age of the unborn child as required
by KRS 311.783(1) or relied upon such a determination made by another
physician and certifies in writing, based on the results of the tests performed,
that in the physician's reasonable medical judgment the unborn child's
probable gestational age is:
1. Less than fifteen (15) weeks; or
2. Twenty-two (22) weeks or less if the pregnancy is the result of rape
under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060 or incest under KRS
530.020(2)(b) or (c), and the termination was performed in accordance
with subsection (1)(k) of Section 2 of this Act.
(b) Except when a medical emergency exists that prevents compliance with one
(1) or more of the following conditions, the affirmative defense set forth in
subsection (2)(b) of this section shall[does] not apply unless the physician
who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally attempts to perform or
induce the abortion complies with all of the following conditions:
1. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion certifies in writing that, in the
physician's reasonable medical judgment, based on the facts known to
the physician at that time, the abortion is medically necessary to prevent
the death of the pregnant woman or to avoid a serious risk of the
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant woman;
2. A different physician not professionally related to the physician
described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph certifies in writing that,
in that different physician's reasonable medical judgment, based on the
facts known to that different physician at that time, the abortion is
medically necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to
Page 28 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
avoid a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function of the pregnant woman;
3. The physician intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion in a hospital or other health
care facility that has appropriate neonatal services for premature infants
unless the abortion is performed on the basis of a lethal fetal anomaly
under Section 2 of this Act;
4. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion terminates or attempts to
terminate the pregnancy in the manner that provides the best opportunity
for the unborn child to survive, unless that physician determines, in the
physician's reasonable medical judgment, based on the facts known to
the physician at that time, that the termination of the pregnancy in that
manner poses a greater risk of death of the pregnant woman or a greater
risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function of the pregnant woman than would other available methods of
abortion, or the termination of the pregnancy is performed under
Section 2 of this Act;
5. The physician certifies in writing the available method or techniques
considered and the reasons for choosing the method or technique
employed; and
6. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion has arranged for the
attendance in the same room in which the abortion is to be performed or
induced or attempted to be performed or induced at least one (1) other
physician who is to take control of, provide immediate medical care for,
and take all reasonable steps necessary to preserve the life and health of
Page 29 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
the unborn child immediately upon the child's complete expulsion or
extraction from the pregnant woman.
(4) The state Board of Medical Licensure may[shall] revoke a physician's license to
practice medicine in this state if the physician violates or fails to comply with this
section.
(5) Any physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally attempts to
perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with actual knowledge that
neither of the affirmative defenses set forth in subsection (2) of this section applies,
or with a heedless indifference as to whether either affirmative defense applies, is
liable in a civil action for compensatory and punitive damages and reasonable
attorney's fees to any person, or the representative of the estate of any person
including but not limited to an unborn child, who sustains injury, death, or loss to
person or property as the result of the performance or inducement or the attempted
performance or inducement of the abortion. In any action under this subsection, the
court also may award any injunctive or other equitable relief that the court
considers appropriate.
(6) A pregnant woman on whom an abortion is intentionally performed or induced or
intentionally attempted to be performed or induced in violation of subsection (1) of
this section is not guilty of violating subsection (1) of this section or of attempting
to commit, conspiring to commit, or complicity in committing a violation of
subsection (1) of this section.
Section 12. KRS 311.783 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except in a medical emergency that prevents compliance with this section, no
physician shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally attempt to perform
or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman unless, prior to the performance or
inducement of the abortion or the attempt to perform or induce the abortion, the
physician determines, in the physician's reasonable medical judgment, the unborn
Page 30 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
child's probable gestational age. The physician shall make that determination after
making inquiries of the pregnant woman and performing any medical examinations
or tests of the pregnant woman the physician considers necessary as a reasonably
prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and medical conditions involved,
would consider necessary to determine the unborn child's probable gestational age.
(2) Except in a medical emergency that prevents compliance with this section, no
physician shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally attempt to perform
or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman after the unborn child reaches the
probable gestational age of fifteen (15) weeks, or twenty-two (22) weeks when the
pregnancy is the result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060 or incest
under KRS 530.020(2)(b) or (c), without first entering the determination made in
subsection (1) of this section and the associated findings of the medical examination
and tests in the medical record of the pregnant woman.
(3) The state Board of Medical Licensure may[shall] suspend a physician's license to
practice medicine in this state for a period of not less than six (6) months if the
physician violates this section.
(4) The physician shall submit a report on a form provided by the cabinet that includes
at a minimum the information required by KRS 213.101 and [:
(a) ]the unborn child's probable gestational age determined by the physician[; and
(b) The results of inquiries of the pregnant woman and any medical examinations
or tests performed].
Section 13. KRS 311.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No publicly owned hospital or other publicly owned health care facility shall
perform or permit the performance of abortions, except as provided in Section 2 of
this Act[to save the life of the pregnant woman].
(2) In the event that a publicly owned hospital or publicly owned health facility is
performing or about to perform an abortion in violation of subsection (1) of this
Page 31 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
section, and law enforcement authorities in the county have failed or refused to take
action to stop such a practice, any resident of the county in which the hospital or
health facility is located, may apply to the Circuit Court of that county for an
injunction or other court process to require compliance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) No private hospital or private health care facility shall be required to, or held liable
for refusal to, perform or permit the performance of abortion contrary to its stated
ethical policy.
(4) No physician, nurse, staff member, or employee of a public or private hospital or
employee of a public or private health care facility, who shall state in writing to
the[such] hospital or health care facility his or her objection to performing,
participating in, or cooperating in, abortion on moral, religious, or professional
grounds, be required to, or held liable for refusal to, perform, participate in, or
cooperate in the[such] abortion.
(5) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the following:
(a) Any person to impose penalties or take disciplinary action against, or to deny
or limit public funds, licenses, certifications, degrees, or other approvals or
documents of qualification to, any hospital or other health care facility due to
the refusal of the[such] hospital or health care facility to perform or permit to
be performed, participate in, or cooperate in, abortion by reason of objection
to abortion[thereto] on moral, religious, or professional grounds, or because
of any statement or other manifestation of attitude by the[such] hospital or
health care facility with respect to abortion;[ or,]
(b) Any person to impose penalties or take disciplinary action against, or to deny
or limit public funds, licenses, certifications, degrees, or other approvals or
documents of qualification to any physician, nurse,[ or] staff member, or
employee of any hospital or health care facility, due to the willingness or
Page 32 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
refusal of such physician, nurse,[ or] staff member, or employee to perform or
participate in abortion by reason of objection to abortion[thereto] on moral,
religious, or professional grounds, or because of any statement or other
manifestation of attitude by the[such] physician, nurse,[ or] staff member, or
employee with respect to abortion; or[,]
(c) Any public or private agency, institution, or person, including a medical,
nursing, or other school, to deny admission to, impose any burdens in terms of
conditions of employment upon, or otherwise discriminate against any
applicant for admission,[ thereto] or any physician, nurse, staff member,
student, or employee[ thereof,] based upon[on account of] the willingness or
refusal of such applicant, physician, nurse, staff member, student, or
employee to perform or participate in abortion or sterilization by reason of
objection thereto on moral, religious, or professional grounds, or because of
any statement or other manifestation of attitude by the[such] person with
respect to abortion or sterilization if that health care facility is not operated
exclusively for the purposes of performing abortions or sterilizations.
Section 14. KRS 213.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each abortion as defined in KRS 213.011 which occurs in the Commonwealth,
regardless of the length of gestation, shall be reported to the Vital Statistics Branch
by the person in charge of the institution within fifteen (15)[three (3)] days after the
end of the month in which the abortion occurred. If the abortion was performed
outside an institution, the attending physician shall prepare and file the report
within fifteen (15)[three (3)] days after the end of the month in which the abortion
occurred.
(2) The report shall include the patient's:
(a) Age;
(b) County of residence;
Page 33 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(c) Number of previous pregnancies, if known;
(d) Number of living children, if known;
(e) The type of abortion procedure performed; and
(f) The reason for the abortion, if known, including abuse, coercion,
harassment, trafficking, rape, or incest[all the information the physician is
required to certify in writing or determine under KRS 311.731, 311.732,
311.7704, 311.7705, 311.7706, 311.7707, 311.7735, 311.7736, 311.774,
311.782, and 311.783, and at a minimum:
(a) The full name and address of the physician who performed the abortion or
provided the abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731;
(b) The address at which the abortion was performed or the address at which the
abortion-inducing drug was provided by a qualified physician, or the method
of obtaining the abortion-inducing drug if not provided by a qualified
physician, including mail order, internet order, or by a telehealth provider in
which case identifying information for the pharmacy, Web site address, or the
telemedicine provider shall be included;
(c) The names, serial numbers, National Drug Codes, lot numbers, and expiration
dates of the specific abortion-inducing drugs that were provided to the
pregnant patient and the dates each were provided;
(d) The full name and address of the referring physician, agency, or service, if
any;
(e) The pregnant patient's city or town, county, state, country of residence, and
zip code;
(f) The pregnant patient's age, race, and ethnicity;
(g) The age or approximate age of the father, if known;
(h) The total number and dates of each previous pregnancy, live birth, and
abortion of the pregnant patient;
Page 34 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(i) The probable gestational and post-fertilization ages of the unborn child, the
methods used to confirm the gestational and post-fertilization ages, and the
date determined;
(j) A list of any pre-existing medical conditions of the pregnant patient that may
complicate her pregnancy, if any, including hemorrhage, infection, uterine
perforation, cervical laceration, retained products, or any other condition;
(k) Whether the fetus was delivered alive and the length of time the fetus
survived;
(l) Whether the fetus was viable and, if viable, the medical reason for
termination;
(m) Whether a pathological examination of the fetus was performed;
(n) Whether the pregnant patient returned for a follow-up examination, the date
and results of any such follow-up examination, and what reasonable efforts
were made by the qualified physician to encourage the patient to reschedule a
follow-up examination if the appointment was missed;
(o) Whether the woman suffered any complications or adverse events as defined
in KRS 311.7731 and what specific complications or adverse events occurred,
and any follow-up treatment provided as required by KRS 311.774;
(p) Whether the pregnant patient was Rh negative and, if so, was provided with
an Rh negative information fact sheet and treated with the prevailing medical
standard of care to prevent harmful fetal or child outcomes or Rh
incompatibility in future pregnancies;
(q) The amount billed to cover the treatment for specific complications or adverse
events, including whether the treatment was billed to Medicaid, private
insurance, private pay, or other method. This should include ICD-10 codes
reported and charges for any physician, hospital, emergency room,
prescription or other drugs, laboratory tests, and any other costs for treatment
Page 35 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
rendered;
(r) The reason for the abortion, if known, including abuse, coercion, harassment,
or trafficking; and
(s) Whether the pregnant patient was tested for sexually transmitted diseases
when providing the informed consent required in KRS 311.725 and 311.7735
twenty-four (24) hours before the abortion procedure or tested at the time of
the abortion procedure, and if the pregnant patient tested positive, was treated
or referred for treatment and follow-up care].
(3) The report shall not contain:
(a) The name of the pregnant patient;
(b) Common identifiers such as a Social Security number and motor vehicle
operator's license number; and
(c) Any other information or identifiers that would make it possible to ascertain
the patient's identity.
(4) [If a person other than the physician described in this subsection makes or
maintains a record required by KRS 311.732, 311.7704, 311.7705, 311.7706, or
311.7707 on the physician's behalf or at the physician's direction, that person shall
comply with the reporting requirement described in this subsection as if the person
were the physician.
(5) Each prescription issued for an abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731
for which the primary indication is the induction of abortion as defined in KRS
213.011 shall be reported to the Vital Statistics Branch within three (3) days after
the end of the month in which the prescription was issued as required by KRS
311.774, but the report shall not include information which will identify the woman
involved or anyone who may be picking up the prescription on behalf of the
woman.
(6) ]The name of the person completing the report and the reporting institution shall not
Page 36 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
be subject to disclosure under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(5)[(7)] By September 30 of each year, the Vital Statistics Branch shall issue a public
report that provides statistics on all data collected, including the type of abortion
procedure used, for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the reports
covering that calendar year submitted to the cabinet in accordance with this section
for each of the items listed in this section.[ Each annual report shall also provide
statistics for all previous calendar years in which this section was in effect, adjusted
to reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports.] The Vital
Statistics Branch shall ensure that none of the information included in the report
could reasonably lead to the identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an
abortion was performed or attempted. Each annual report shall be made available
on the cabinet's website[Web site].
[(8) (a) Any person or institution who fails to submit a report by the end of thirty (30)
days following the due date set in this section shall be subject to a late fee of
five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional thirty (30) day period or
portion of a thirty (30) day period the report is overdue.
(b) Any person or institution who fails to submit a report, or who has submitted
only an incomplete report, more than one (1) year following the due date set
in this section, may in a civil action brought by the Vital Statistics Branch be
directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report
within a time period stated by court order or be subject to contempt of court.
(c) Failure by any physician to comply with the requirements of this section,
other than filing a late report, or to submit a complete report in accordance
with a court order shall subject the physician to KRS 311.595.
(9) Intentional falsification of any report required under this section is a Class A
misdemeanor.]
(6)[(10)] The Vital Statistics Branch shall promulgate administrative regulations in
Page 37 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to assist in compliance with this section.[
(11) (a) The Office of the Inspector General, Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
shall annually audit the required reporting of abortion-related information to
the Vital Statistics Branch in this section and KRS 213.172, and in so doing,
shall function as a health oversight agency of the Commonwealth for this
specific purpose.
(b) The Office of the Inspector General shall ensure that none of the information
included in the audit report could reasonably lead to the identification of any
pregnant woman upon whom an abortion was performed or attempted.
(c) If any personally identifiable information is viewed or recorded by the Office
of the Inspector General in conducting an audit authorized by this subsection,
the information held by the Inspector General shall not be subject to the
Kentucky Open Records Act, shall be confidential, and shall only be released
upon court order.
(d) The Inspector General shall submit a written report to the General Assembly
and the Attorney General by October 1 of each year. The reports shall include
findings from:
1. The audit required in this subsection, including any identified reporting
deficiencies; and
2. All abortion facility inspections, including any violations of KRS
216B.0431 and 216B.0435.]
Section 15. KRS 311.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates KRS 311.250 shall be guilty of a violation.
(2) Any college or college professor [thereof ]violating the provisions of KRS 311.300
to 311.350 shall be civilly liable on his or her bond for a sum not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
violation, which may be recovered by an action in the name of the Commonwealth.
Page 38 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(3) Any person who presents to the county clerk for the purpose of registration any
license which has been fraudulently obtained, or obtains any license under KRS
311.380 to 311.510 by false or fraudulent statement or representation, or practices
podiatry under a false or assumed name or falsely impersonates another practitioner
or former practitioner of a like or different name, or aids and abets any person in the
practice of podiatry within the state without conforming to the requirements of KRS
311.380 to 311.510, or otherwise violates or neglects to comply with any of the
provisions of KRS 311.380 to 311.510, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Each case of practicing podiatry in violation of the provisions of KRS 311.380 to
311.510 shall be considered a separate offense.
(4) Each violation of KRS 311.560 shall constitute a Class D felony.
(5) Each violation of KRS 311.590 shall constitute a Class D felony. Conviction under
this subsection of a holder of a license or permit shall result automatically in
permanent revocation of the[such] license or permit.
(6) Conviction of willfully resisting, preventing, impeding, obstructing, threatening, or
interfering with the board or any of its members, or of any officer, agent, inspector,
or investigator of the board or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in the
administration of any of the provisions of KRS 311.550 to 311.620 shall be a Class
A misdemeanor.
(7) Each violation of KRS 311.375(1) shall, for the first offense, be a Class B
misdemeanor, and, for each subsequent offense shall be a Class A misdemeanor.
(8) Each violation of KRS 311.375(2) shall, for the first offense, be a violation, and, for
each subsequent offense, be a Class B misdemeanor.
(9) Each day of violation of either subsection of KRS 311.375 shall constitute a
separate offense.
(10) (a) Any person who intentionally or knowingly performs an abortion contrary to
the requirements of KRS 311.723(1) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
Page 39 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(b) Any person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates the
requirements of KRS 311.723(2) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(11) (a) 1. Any physician who performs a partial-birth abortion in violation of KRS
311.765 shall be guilty of a Class D felony. However, a physician shall
not be guilty of the criminal offense if the partial-birth abortion was
necessary to save the life of the mother whose life was endangered by a
physical disorder, illness, or injury.
2. A physician may seek a hearing before the State Board of Medical
Licensure on whether the physician's conduct was necessary to save the
life of the mother whose life was endangered by a physical disorder,
illness, or injury. The board's findings, decided by majority vote of a
quorum, shall be admissible at the trial of the physician. The board shall
promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this
subparagraph.
3. Upon a motion of the physician, the court shall delay the beginning of
the trial for not more than thirty (30) days to permit the hearing, referred
to in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, to occur.
(b) Any person other than a physician who performs a partial-birth abortion shall
not be prosecuted under this subsection but shall be prosecuted under
provisions of law which prohibit any person other than a physician from
performing any abortion.
(c) No penalty shall be assessed against the woman upon whom the partial-birth
abortion is performed or attempted to be performed.
(12) (a) Except as provided in KRS 311.732(12), any person who intentionally,
knowingly, or recklessly performs an abortion upon a minor without obtaining
the required consent pursuant to KRS 311.732 shall be guilty of a Class D
felony.
Page 40 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any person who
intentionally or knowingly fails to conform to any requirement of KRS
311.732 is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) Any person who negligently releases information or documents which are
confidential under KRS 311.732 is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(13) [Any person who performs an abortion upon a married woman either with
knowledge or in reckless disregard of whether KRS 311.735 applies to her and who
intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly fails to conform to the requirements of KRS
311.735 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(14) ]Any person convicted of violating KRS 311.750 shall be guilty of a Class B
felony.
(14)[(15)] Any person who violates KRS 311.760(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(15)[(16)] Any person who violates KRS 311.770 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(16)[(17)] Except as provided in KRS 311.787(3), any person who intentionally violates
KRS 311.787 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(17)[(18)] A person convicted of violating KRS 311.780 shall be guilty of a Class C
felony.
(18)[(19)] Except as provided in KRS 311.782(6), any person who intentionally violates
KRS 311.782 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(19)[(20)] Any person who violates KRS 311.783(1) shall be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor.
(20)[(21)] Any person who violates KRS 311.7705(1) is guilty of a Class D felony.
(21)[(22)] Any person who violates KRS 311.7706(1) is guilty of a Class D felony.
(22)[(23)] Except as provided in KRS 311.731(7), any person who violates KRS
311.731(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(23)[(24)] Any physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, nurse,
or other healthcare provider who intentionally violates KRS 311.823(2) shall be
Page 41 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
guilty of a Class D felony. As used in this subsection, "healthcare provider" has the
same meaning as in KRS 311.821.
(24)[(25)] Any person who violates KRS 311.810 shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(25)[(26)] Any professional medical association or society, licensed physician, or
hospital or hospital medical staff who violates[shall have violated the provisions of]
KRS 311.606 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(26)[(27)] Any administrator, officer, or employee of a publicly owned hospital or
publicly owned health care facility who performs or permits the performance of
abortions in violation of KRS 311.800(1) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(27)[(28)] Any person who violates KRS 311.905(3) shall be guilty of a violation.
(28)[(29)] Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 311.820 shall be guilty of a
Class A misdemeanor.
(29)[(30)] Any person who fails to test organs, skin, or other human tissue which is to be
transplanted, or violates the confidentiality provisions required by KRS 311.281,
shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(30)[(31)] Any person who sells or makes a charge for any transplantable organ shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(31)[(32)] Any person who offers remuneration for any transplantable organ for use in
transplantation into himself or herself shall be fined not less than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(32)[(33)] Any person brokering the sale or transfer of any transplantable organ shall be
guilty of a Class C felony.
(33)[(34)] Any person charging a fee associated with the transplantation of a
transplantable organ in excess of the direct and indirect costs of procuring,
distributing, or transplanting the transplantable organ shall be fined not less than
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) nor more than five hundred thousand dollars
Page 42 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 104
($500,000).
(34)[(35)] Any hospital performing transplantable organ transplants which knowingly
fails to report the possible sale, purchase, or brokering of a transplantable organ
shall be fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000).
(35)[(36)] (a) Any physician or qualified technician who violates KRS 311.727 shall
be fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a first
offense and not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for
each subsequent offense.
(b) In addition to the fine, the court shall report the violation of any physician, in
writing, to the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure for such action and
discipline as the board deems appropriate.
(36)[(37)] Any person who violates KRS 311.691 shall be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor for the first offense, and a Class A misdemeanor for a second or
subsequent offense. In addition to any other penalty imposed for that violation, the
board may, through the Attorney General, petition a Circuit Court to enjoin the
person who is violating KRS 311.691 from practicing genetic counseling in
violation of the requirements of KRS 311.690 to 311.700.
(37)[(38)] Any person convicted of violating KRS 311.728 shall be guilty of a Class D
felony.
(38)[(39)] (a) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates KRS
311.7731 to 311.7739 is guilty of a Class D felony.
(b) No criminal penalty may be assessed against a pregnant patient upon whom a
drug-induced abortion is attempted, induced, or performed.
Section 16. The following KRS section is repealed:
311.735 Notice to spouse -- Exceptions -- Civil remedies.
Section 17. This Act may be cited as the Compassionate Care Act.
Page 43 of 43
XXXX 3/2/2026 7:45 PM Jacketed